en: rhodiola rosea
az: çəhrayı rodiola
ba: алтын тамыр
ca: rhodiola rosea
cs: rozchodnice růžová
cy: pren y ddannoedd
da: almindelig rosenrod
de: rosenwurz
el: ροδιόλα η ροδόχρους
es: rhodiola rosea
et: roosilõhnaline kuldjuur
eu: rhodiola rosea
fi: ruusujuuri
fr: rhodiola rosea
hi: रोडियोला रोजिया
hr: ružičasti žednjak
hu: illatos rózsásvarjúháj
is: burnirót
it: rhodiola rosea
ja: イワベンケイ
kk: алтын тамыр
kl: tullerunnaq
ko: 돌꽃
ky: алтын тамыр
ml: റോഡിയോള റോസിയ
mn: алтан гагнуур
nb: rosenrot
nl: rozewortel
nn: rosenrot
pl: różeniec górski
ro: rhodiola rosea
ru: родиола розовая
se: gálberássi
sl: rožni koren
sv: rosenrot
uk: родіола рожева
zh: 红景天

en: Cape gooseberry, Cape gooseberries, goldenberry, goldenberries, golden berry, golden berries, Peruvian groundcherry, groundcherries, poha
es: uchuva, aguaymanto, uvilla
hr: rt ogrozd
it: uva spina del Capo
la: Physalis peruviana, physalis
pl: Miechunka peruwiańska, rodzynek brazylijski, jagoda inkaska, jagoda inków, miechunka

en: Indian Gooseberry, Amla
it: uva spina indiana

en: ashwagandha, withania somnifera
am: ጊዜዋ
ar: عبعب منوم
as: অশ্বগন্ধা
bg: Ашваганда
bn: অশ্বগন্ধা
ca: bufera
cs: withanie snodárná
de: schlafbeere
es: withania somnifera
et: uimastav juustumari
fa: گیلاس زمستانی
fi: rohtokoisio, ashwagandha
fr: ashwagandha
gu: અશ્વગંધા
he: ויתניה משכרת
hi: अश्वगंधा
hr: ashwagandha
hu: álombogyó
it: withania somnifera
ja: アシュワガンダ
kn: ಅಶ್ವಗಂಧಾ
ml: അമുക്കുരം
mr: आसकंद
ne: अश्वगन्धा
nl: ashwaganda
pa: ਅਸ਼ਵਗੰਧਾ
pl: witania ospała, ashwagandha
pt: withania somnifera
si: අමුක්කරා
sv: withania somnifera
ta: அமுக்கிரா
te: అశ్వగంధ
uk: withania somnifera
vi: sâm ấn độ
zh: 睡茄

en: Yacón
it: yacon
ja: ヤーコン

en: Ashitaba
es: Angelica keiskei
hr: ashitaba
id: Ashitaba
it: Angelica keiskei
ja: アシタバ, 明日葉, あしたば
jv: Ashitaba
ru: Angelica keiskei
sv: Angelica keiskei
vi: Angelica keiskei
zh: 明日叶

en: Angelica
it: angelica
la: Angelica archangelica

en: Japanese hornwort
it: hornwort giapponese
ja: ミツバ, ミツバゼリ, 三つ葉, 三葉, みつば

en: Garlic chive, Asian chive, Chinese chive
it: aglio erba cipollina
ja: ニラ, にら

en: Mizuna, kyona, Japanese mustard greens
it: mizuna
ja: ミズナ, 水菜, みずな, キョウナ, 京菜, きょうな

en: Nozawana
it: nozawana
ja: ノザワナ, 野沢菜, のざわな

en: Gardenia jasminoides
ar: غردينية ياسمينية
as: তগৰ
az: Jasminəbənzər qardeniya
be: Gardenia jasminoides
bn: গন্ধরাজ
ca: Gardenia jasminoides
cs: Gardénie jasmínovitá
de: Gardenie
es: Gardenia jasminoides
fa: گاردنیا
fi: Kiinangardenia
hi: अनंत वृक्ष
hr: gardenija jasminoidna
id: Kacapiring
it: Gardenia jasminoides
ja: クチナシ
jv: Ceplok piring
ko: 치자나무
ml: ഗന്ധരാജൻ
my: ဇီဇဝါ
ne: इन्द्रकमल
nl: Kaapse jasmijn
no: Gardenia
pl: Gardenia jaśminowata
pt: Gardenia jasminoides
ro: Gardenia jasminoides
ru: Гардения жасминовидная
su: Kacapiring
ta: கும்பிலி
th: พุดซ้อน
to: Siale matalateau
ty: Taina
uz: Gardenia jasminoides
vi: Dành dành
zh: 栀子花

en: algae
af: Alg
an: Algas
ar: طحالب
as: শেলাই
az: Yosunlar
be: водарасці
bg: Водорасли
bn: শৈবাল
bs: Alge
ca: Alga
cs: řasy
da: Alge
de: Alge
el: Φύκη
eo: algo
es: alga, algas
et: Vetikad, vetikas
eu: alga
fa: جلبک
fi: Levä
fr: algue, algues
ga: Algaí
gl: Alga
gu: લીલ
gv: Algey
he: אצות
hi: शैवाल
hr: alge
ht: Alg
hu: algák
hy: ջրիմուռներ
id: alga
io: Algo
is: Þörungar
it: alga
ja: 藻類
jv: Alga
ka: წყალმცენარეები
kk: Балдыр
kn: ಆಲ್ಗೆ
ko: 조류
ky: Балырлар
la: Alga
li: Alge
lt: Dumbliai
lv: Aļģes
mk: Алги
ml: ആൽഗ
mr: शैवाल
ms: Alga
nb: alge
ne: लेऊ
nl: algen, alge
nn: algar
oc: Alga
pa: ਜਿਲਬ
pl: glony, algi
ps: اوبړۍ
pt: alga
qu: Laqu
ro: alge
ru: водоросли
sd: الجي
sh: Alge
sk: Riasa
sl: Alge
sr: Алге
su: Alga
sv: Alger
sw: Algae
ta: பாசி
te: శైవలాలు
th: สาหร่าย
tr: su yosunları
tt: суүсемнәр
ud: Вубуртчин
uk: водорості
ur: طحالب
uz: Suvoʻtlar
vi: Tảo
wa: Ale
zh: 藻類

en: chlorella, chlorella algae
ar: كلوريلا
be: Хларэла
bg: Хлорела
bn: Хлорела
ca: Chlorella
cs: Chlorella
da: Chlorella
de: Chlorella
eo: Klorelo
es: Chlorella
et: Klorella
eu: Chlorella
fi: Klorella
fr: chlorella, chlorelle
ga: Clóireile
gl: Chlorella
he: כלורלה
hr: chlorella, klorela alge
hy: քլորելա
ia: Chlorella
id: Chlorella
it: Chlorella
ja: クロレラ
kk: Хлорелла
ko: 클로렐라
ky: Хлорелла
la: Chlorella
nl: Chlorella
pl: Chlorella, chlorelli
pt: Chlorella
ru: Хлорелла
sh: Chlorella
sk: Chlorela
sl: Chlorella
sw: Chlorella
tr: Chlorella
uk: Хлорела
vi: Chlorella

en: spirulina
xx: spirulina
ar: سبيرولنا
bg: Спирулина
bn: স্পিরুলিনা
el: Σπιρουλίνα
eo: Spirulino
fi: spirulina, spirulinaa, spirulina-levä, spiruliinaa
fr: spirulina, spiruline, spiruline crue
he: ספירולינה
ja: スピルリナ
ko: 스피룰리나
la: Spirulina platensis
ml: സ്പൈറുലിന
my: စပီရူလိုင်းနား
pl: spirulina, spirulíny, spiruliny
ro: Spirulia
ru: Спирулина
ta: நீலப்பச்சைப்பாசி
te: స్పైరులీనా
vi: Tảo xoắn
zh: 螺旋藻

en: dehydrated spirulina
de: Dehydrierter Spirulina
fi: kuivattu spirulina
fr: spiruline déshydratée
hr: dehidrirana spirulina
it: spirulina disidratata
nl: gedehydrateerde spirulina

en: spirulina powder
bg: спирулина на прах
de: Spirulina Pulver
fi: spirulinajauhe, spirulina-jauhe
fr: poudre de spiruline
hr: spirulina u prahu
it: Polvere di spirulina
nl: spirulinapoeder
pl: sproszkowana spirulina, spirulina w proszku

en: spirulina concentrate, spirulina extract, spirulina extract color
de: Spirulina-konzentrat, Spirulinakonzentrat
es: Concetrado de espirulina
fi: spirulinatiiviste, spirulinauute
fr: concentré de spiruline, extrait couleur de spiruline
hr: koncentrat spiruline
it: concentrato di spirulina
nl: Spirulinaconcentraat
pl: koncentrat spiruliny, barwiący koncentrat spiruliny
ro: concentrat de spirulină, concentrat de spirulina

en: seaweed
af: Seewier
ar: عشب بحري
br: bezhin
cs: mořské řasy
cy: Gwymon
da: tang
de: Seetang
eo: Makroalgoj
es: Macroalga, alga marina, algas de mar
et: Adru
eu: Itsas belar
fa: جلبک دریایی
fi: Merilevä
fo: Tari
fr: algue marine
ga: Feamainn
gd: Feamainn ghropach
he: אצה
hi: समुद्री खरपतवार
hr: morska trava, morske alge
id: Fucales
io: Fuko
is: Þang
it: Fucales
iu: ᕿᖅᑯᐊᖅ
ja: 海藻
jv: Gulma segara
kk: Теңіз балдырлары
ko: 바닷말
lt: Jūržolės
mk: морска трева
ml: ഗായത്രിമന്ത്രം
ms: Rumpai laut
nb: tang
nl: zeewier
nn: tang
pl: Wodorosty, algi morskie, alg morskich
pt: macroalga
ru: Морские водоросли
sq: Alga deti
sv: tång, havstång
to: Limutahi
uk: Морські водорості
vi: Rong biển
zh: 海藻

en: algae concentrate
de: Algenkonzentrat
es: concentrado de algas
fi: levätiiviste
fr: concentré d'algues
hr: koncentrat algi
it: concentrato di alghe
nl: algenconcentraat